Massachusetts, session 194th, S2337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 2 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting the following new section:-
Section 64. (a) The governor may appoint a resident of the commonwealth to serve as
choreographer laureate of the commonwealth, selected from a list of nominees submitted by the
choreographer laureate nominating committee established in this section. The choreographer
laureate shall seek to encourage participation in the arts, elevate the dance legacy and current
dance communities in the commonwealth, and choreograph performances for important state
events and ceremonies. The choreographer laureate shall be appointed to serve for a term of 4
years and may be reappointed for a second term. A choreographer laureate vacancy shall be
filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
of 3

(b) (i) There shall be a choreographer laureate nominating committee consisting of the
following 5 members: the executive director of the Massachusetts cultural council, or their
designee, who shall serve as chair; the executive and artistic director of Jacob’s Pillow Dance
Festival, Inc., or their designee; the executive artistic director of The Dance Complex, or their
designee; the executive director of The Yard, or their designee; and a member of the Boston
Ballet company, selected by the chair. Nominating committee members shall serve without
compensation.
(ii) Not less than 5 months prior to the expiration of the then-current choreographer
laureate’s tenure, the nominating committee shall conduct culturally competent and linguistically
diverse public outreach and receive nominations of potential candidates for selection as
choreographer laureate. Self-nominations and nominations from members of the nominating
committee shall be permitted. Nominees shall be residents of the commonwealth who are
presently or were previously engaged in the art of choreography and who has produced a body of
choreographic work. Nominations shall include biographical and professional information about
the nominee.
(iii) The nominating committee shall review all nominations and select 3 nominees based
on their overall excellence and demonstrated commitment to the arts in the commonwealth.
Nominees should represent the commonwealth’s diverse dance community. The nominating
committee shall submit the 3 nominees to the governor not less than 4 weeks prior to the
expiration of the then-current choreographer laureate’s tenure, or as soon as possible in the event
of a vacancy.
of 3

(c) (i) The choreographer laureate shall be an honorary position and the person appointed
shall receive no remuneration from the commonwealth. The person appointed to the position of
choreographer laureate shall not be considered a state official or a state employee for such
person’s service in the position.
(ii) The choreographer laureate shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred
in the performance of duties as choreographer laureate, not exceeding $1,000 per fiscal year of
the commonwealth.
(iii) Dancers and support staff selected by the choreographer laureate for performances at
important state events and ceremonies, consistent with the provisions of paragraph (a) of this
section, shall be entitled to market value compensation.
of 3